New York, session 2025-2026, S7955.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 and paragraph d of subdivision 2 of section 2 236 of the vehicle and traffic law, subdivision 1 as amended by section 3 2 of part N of chapter 58 of the laws of 2025, paragraph d of subdivi- 4 sion 2 as amended by chapter 342 of the laws of 1981, are amended to 5 read as follows: 6 1. Creation. In any city as hereinbefore or hereafter authorized such 7 tribunal when created shall be known as the parking violations bureau 8 and shall have jurisdiction of traffic infractions which constitute a 9 parking violation and, any county, town, or village or hereafter author- 10 ized such tribunal when created shall be known as a traffic-camera 11 violations bureau, where authorized: (a) to adjudicate the liability of 12 owners for violations of subdivision (d) of section eleven hundred elev- 13 en of this chapter imposed pursuant to a local law or ordinance imposing 14 monetary liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure of an operator 15 thereof to comply with traffic-control indications through the installa- 16 tion and operation of traffic-control signal photo violation-monitoring 17 systems, in accordance with article twenty-four of this chapter, or (b) 18 to adjudicate the liability of owners for violations of subdivision (b), EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13099-03-6 S. 7955--B 2 1 (c), (d), (f) or (g) of section eleven hundred eighty of this chapter 2 imposed pursuant to a demonstration program imposing monetary liability 3 on the owner of a vehicle for failure of an operator thereof to comply 4 with such posted maximum speed limits through the installation and oper- 5 ation of photo speed violation monitoring systems, in accordance with 6 article thirty of this chapter, or (c) to adjudicate the liability of 7 owners for violations of bus lane restrictions as defined by article 8 twenty-four of this chapter imposed pursuant to a bus rapid transit 9 program imposing monetary liability on the owner of a vehicle for fail- 10 ure of an operator thereof to comply with such bus lane restrictions 11 through the installation and operation of bus lane photo devices, in 12 accordance with article twenty-four of this chapter, or (d) to adjudi- 13 cate the liability of owners for violations of toll collection regu- 14 lations imposed by certain public authorities pursuant to the law 15 authorizing such public authorities to impose monetary liability on the 16 owner of a vehicle for failure of an operator thereof to comply with 17 toll collection regulations of such public authorities through the 18 installation and operation of photo-monitoring systems, in accordance 19 with the provisions of section two thousand nine hundred eighty-five of 20 the public authorities law and sections sixteen-a, sixteen-b and 21 sixteen-c of chapter seven hundred seventy-four of the laws of nineteen 22 hundred fifty, or (e) to adjudicate the liability of owners for 23 violations of section eleven hundred seventy-four of this chapter when 24 meeting a school bus marked and equipped as provided in subdivisions 25 twenty and twenty-one-c of section three hundred seventy-five of this 26 chapter imposed pursuant to a local law or ordinance imposing monetary 27 liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure of an operator thereof 28 to comply with school bus red visual signals through the installation 29 and operation of school bus photo violation monitoring systems, in 30 accordance with article twenty-nine of this chapter, or (f) to adjudi- 31 cate the liability of owners for violations of section three hundred 32 eighty-five of this chapter and the rules of the applicable covered 33 agency or covered authority as such terms are defined in article ten of 34 this chapter in relation to gross vehicle weight and/or axle weight 35 violations imposed pursuant to a weigh in motion demonstration program 36 imposing monetary liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure of an 37 operator thereof to comply with such gross vehicle weight and/or axle 38 weight restrictions through the installation and operation of weigh in 39 motion violation monitoring systems, in accordance with article ten of 40 this chapter, or (g) to adjudicate the liability of owners for 41 violations of subdivision (b), (d), (f) or (g) of section eleven hundred 42 eighty of this chapter imposed pursuant to a demonstration program 43 imposing monetary liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure of an 44 operator thereof to comply with such posted maximum speed limits within 45 a highway construction or maintenance work area through the installation 46 and operation of photo speed violation monitoring systems, in accordance 47 with article thirty of this chapter, or (h) to adjudicate the liability 48 of owners for violations of bus operation-related traffic regulations as 49 defined by article twenty-four of this chapter imposed pursuant to a 50 demonstration program imposing monetary liability on the owner of a 51 vehicle for failure of an operator thereof to comply with such bus oper- 52 ation-related traffic regulations through the installation and operation 53 of bus operation-related photo devices, in accordance with article twen- 54 ty-four of this chapter. Such tribunal, except in a city with a popu- 55 lation of one million or more, shall also have jurisdiction of abandoned 56 vehicle violations. For the purposes of this article, a parking S. 7955--B 3 1 violation is the violation of any law, rule or regulation providing for 2 or regulating the parking, stopping or standing of a vehicle. In addi- 3 tion for purposes of this article, "commissioner" shall mean and include 4 the commissioner of traffic of the city or an official possessing 5 authority as such a commissioner. 6 d. The commissioner shall appoint hearing examiners who shall preside 7 at hearings for the adjudication of charges of parking violations and 8 other violations authorized by law. Hearing examiners shall be 9 appointed and shall serve for such number of sessions as may be deter- 10 mined by the commissioner and shall receive therefor, such remuneration 11 as may be fixed. Such hearing examiners shall not be considered employ- 12 ees of the county, city, town, or village in which the administrative 13 tribunal has been established. Every hearing examiner shall have been 14 admitted to the practice of law in this state for a period of at least 15 five years, except in cities having a population of one million or more 16 persons where they shall have been admitted to such practice for a peri- 17 od of at least three years. Hearing examiners shall be appointed from a 18 list of eligible candidates who have satisfied the standards established 19 by a duly constituted committee of the bar association of the county in 20 which the city is located or, the association of the bar of that city. 21 § 2. Subparagraph (i) of paragraph a of subdivision 5-a of section 401 22 of the vehicle and traffic law, as amended by section 7 of part N of 23 chapter 58 of the laws of 2025, is amended to read as follows: 24 (i) If at the time of application for a registration or renewal there- 25 of there is a certification from a court, parking violations bureau, 26 traffic and parking violations agency or administrative tribunal of 27 appropriate jurisdiction that the registrant or their representative 28 failed to appear on the return date or any subsequent adjourned date or 29 failed to comply with the rules and regulations of an administrative 30 tribunal following entry of a final decision in response to either a 31 total of three or more summonses or other process in the aggregate, 32 issued within an eighteen month period, or summonses or other process in 33 the aggregate resulting in total monetary liability of two hundred fifty 34 dollars or greater, charging either that: (i) such motor vehicle was 35 parked, stopped or standing, or that such motor vehicle was operated for 36 hire by the registrant or their agent without being licensed as a motor 37 vehicle for hire by the appropriate local authority, in violation of any 38 of the provisions of this chapter or of any law, ordinance, rule or 39 regulation made by a local authority; or (ii) the registrant was liable 40 for a violation of subdivision (d) of section eleven hundred eleven of 41 this chapter imposed pursuant to a local law or ordinance imposing mone- 42 tary liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure of an operator 43 thereof to comply with traffic-control indications through the installa- 44 tion and operation of traffic-control signal photo violation-monitoring 45 systems, in accordance with article twenty-four of this chapter; or 46 (iii) the registrant was liable for a violation of subdivision (b), (c), 47 (d), (f) or (g) of section eleven hundred eighty of this chapter imposed 48 pursuant to a demonstration program imposing monetary liability on the 49 owner of a vehicle for failure of an operator thereof to comply with 50 such posted maximum speed limits through the installation and operation 51 of photo speed violation monitoring systems, in accordance with article 52 thirty of this chapter; or (iv) the registrant was liable for a 53 violation of bus lane restrictions as defined by article twenty-four of 54 this chapter imposed pursuant to a bus rapid transit program imposing 55 monetary liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure of an operator 56 thereof to comply with such bus lane restrictions through the installa- S. 7955--B 4 1 tion and operation of bus lane photo devices, in accordance with article 2 twenty-four of this chapter; or (v) the registrant was liable for a 3 violation of section eleven hundred seventy-four of this chapter when 4 meeting a school bus marked and equipped as provided in subdivisions 5 twenty and twenty-one-c of section three hundred seventy-five of this 6 chapter imposed pursuant to a local law or ordinance imposing monetary 7 liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure of an operator thereof 8 to comply with school bus red visual signals through the installation 9 and operation of school bus photo violation monitoring systems, in 10 accordance with article twenty-nine of this chapter; or (vi) the regis- 11 trant was liable for a violation of section three hundred eighty-five of 12 this chapter and the rules of the applicable covered agency or covered 13 authority as such terms are defined in article ten of this chapter in 14 relation to gross vehicle weight and/or axle weight violations imposed 15 pursuant to a weigh in motion demonstration program imposing monetary 16 liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure of an operator thereof 17 to comply with such gross vehicle weight and/or axle weight restrictions 18 through the installation and operation of weigh in motion violation 19 monitoring systems, in accordance with article ten of this chapter; or 20 (vii) the registrant was liable for a violation of subdivision (b), (d), 21 (f) or (g) of section eleven hundred eighty of this chapter imposed 22 pursuant to a demonstration program imposing monetary liability on the 23 owner of a vehicle for failure of an operator thereof to comply with 24 such posted maximum speed limits within a highway construction or main- 25 tenance work area through the installation and operation of photo speed 26 violation monitoring systems, in accordance with article thirty of this 27 chapter, or (viii) the registrant was liable for a violation of bus 28 operation-related traffic regulations as defined by article twenty-four 29 of this chapter imposed pursuant to a demonstration program imposing 30 monetary liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure of an operator 31 thereof to comply with such bus operation-related traffic regulations 32 through the installation and operation of bus operation-related photo 33 devices, in accordance with article twenty-four of this chapter, the 34 commissioner or their agent shall deny the registration or renewal 35 application until the applicant provides proof from the court, traffic 36 and parking violations agency or administrative tribunal wherein the 37 charges are pending that an appearance or answer has been made or in the 38 case of an administrative tribunal that such applicant has complied with 39 the rules and regulations of said tribunal following entry of a final 40 decision. Where an application is denied pursuant to this section, the 41 commissioner may, in their discretion, deny a registration or renewal 42 application to any other person for the same vehicle and may deny a 43 registration or renewal application for any other motor vehicle regis- 44 tered in the name of the applicant where the commissioner has determined 45 that such registrant's intent has been to evade the purposes of this 46 subdivision and where the commissioner has reasonable grounds to believe 47 that such registration or renewal will have the effect of defeating the 48 purposes of this subdivision. Such denial shall only remain in effect as 49 long as the summonses remain unanswered, or in the case of an adminis- 50 trative tribunal, the registrant fails to comply with the rules and 51 regulations following entry of a final decision. 52 § 3. Subdivision (a) of section 1174 of the vehicle and traffic law, 53 as amended by chapter 597 of the laws of 1990, is amended to read as 54 follows: 55 (a) The driver of a vehicle upon a public highway, street or private 56 road upon meeting or overtaking from either direction any school bus, S. 7955--B 5 1 for which there shall be a rebuttable presumption that such school bus 2 was marked and equipped as provided in subdivision twenty of section 3 three hundred seventy-five of this chapter which has stopped on the 4 public highway, street or private road for the purpose of receiving or 5 discharging any passengers, or which has stopped because a school bus in 6 front of it has stopped to receive or discharge any passengers, shall 7 stop the vehicle before reaching such school bus when there is in opera- 8 tion on said school bus a red visual signal as specified in subdivision 9 twenty of section three hundred seventy-five of this chapter and said 10 driver shall not proceed until such school bus resumes motion, or until 11 signaled by the driver or a police officer to proceed. For the purposes 12 of this section, and in addition to the provisions of section one 13 hundred thirty-four of this chapter, the term "public highway" shall 14 mean any area used for the parking of motor vehicles or used as a drive- 15 way located on the grounds of a school or of a board of cooperative 16 educational services facility or any area used as a means of access to 17 and egress from such school or facility. 18 § 4. Paragraphs 1 and 2 of subdivision (a) of section 1174-a of the 19 vehicle and traffic law, as amended by section 1 of part AA of chapter 20 56 of the laws of 2024, are amended to read as follows: 21 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a county, city, town or 22 village located within a school district ("district") is hereby author- 23 ized and empowered to adopt and amend a local law or ordinance applica- 24 ble to all roadways within its boundaries establishing a demonstration 25 program imposing monetary liability on the owner of a vehicle for fail- 26 ure of an operator thereof to comply with subdivision (a) of section 27 eleven hundred seventy-four of this article when meeting a school bus 28 marked and equipped as provided in subdivisions twenty and twenty-one-c 29 of section three hundred seventy-five of this chapter and operated in 30 such county, city, town or village, in accordance with the provisions of 31 this section. Such demonstration program shall empower such county, 32 city, town or village to install and operate school bus photo violation 33 monitoring systems which may be stationary or mobile, and which may be 34 installed, pursuant to an agreement with a school district within such 35 county, city, town or village, on school buses owned and operated by 36 such school district or privately owned and operated for compensation 37 under contract with such district. Provided, however, that (a) no 38 stationary school bus photo violation monitoring system shall be 39 installed or operated by a county, city, town or village except on road- 40 ways under the jurisdiction of such county, city, town or village, and 41 (b) no mobile school bus photo violation monitoring system shall be 42 installed or operated on any such school buses unless such county, city, 43 town or village and such district enter into an agreement for such 44 installation and operation. 45 2. Any image or images captured by school bus photo violation monitor- 46 ing systems shall be inadmissible in any disciplinary proceeding 47 convened by any school district or any school bus contractor thereof, 48 and any proceeding initiated by the department involving licensure priv- 49 ileges of school bus operators. [Any] Notwithstanding any other 50 provision of this section, any school bus photo violation monitoring 51 device mounted on a school bus shall be directed outwardly from such 52 school bus to capture images of vehicles operated in violation of subdi- 53 vision (a) of section eleven hundred seventy-four of this article, and 54 images produced by such device shall not be used for any other purpose, 55 including federal immigration enforcement assistance, except as provided S. 7955--B 6 1 by section eleven hundred eleven-c of this title, for statistical 2 purposes, educational purposes, or other governmental purposes. 3 § 5. Subparagraph (i) of paragraph 3 of subdivision (a) of section 4 1174-a of the vehicle and traffic law, as added by chapter 145 of the 5 laws of 2019, is amended to read as follows: 6 (i) [Any] Until final disposition of a notice of liability issued 7 pursuant to this section, any participating school district shall be 8 prohibited from accessing any photographs, microphotographs, videotapes, 9 other recorded images or data from school bus photo violation monitoring 10 systems allegedly evidencing a motor vehicle operated in violation of 11 subdivision (a) of section eleven hundred seventy-four of this article, 12 but shall provide, pursuant to an agreement with a county, city, town or 13 village as provided in this section, for the proper handling and custody 14 of such photographs, microphotographs, videotapes, other recorded images 15 and data produced by such systems, and for the forwarding of such photo- 16 graphs, microphotographs, videotapes, other recorded images and data to 17 the applicable county, city, town or village for the purpose of deter- 18 mining whether a motor vehicle was operated in violation of subdivision 19 (a) of section eleven hundred seventy-four of this [title] article and 20 imposing monetary liability on the owner of such motor vehicle therefor. 21 § 6. Paragraph 4 of subdivision (a) of section 1174-a of the vehicle 22 and traffic law, as added by chapter 145 of the laws of 2019, subpara- 23 graph (iii) as amended by section 1 of part AA of chapter 56 of the laws 24 of 2024, is amended to read as follows: 25 4. A county, city, town or village establishing a demonstration 26 program pursuant to this section shall adopt and enforce measures to 27 protect the privacy of drivers, passengers, pedestrians and cyclists 28 whose identity and identifying information may be captured by a school 29 bus photo violation monitoring device. Such measures shall include: 30 (i) utilization of necessary technologies to ensure, to the extent 31 practicable, that photographs produced by such school bus photo 32 violation monitoring systems shall not include images that identify the 33 driver, the passengers, the contents of the vehicle, pedestrians and 34 cyclists. Provided, however, that no notice of liability issued pursuant 35 to this section shall be dismissed solely because a photograph or photo- 36 graphs allow for the identification of the contents of a vehicle, 37 provided that such county, city, town or village has made a reasonable 38 effort to comply with the provisions of this paragraph; 39 (ii) a prohibition on the use or dissemination of vehicles' license 40 plate information and other information and images captured by school 41 bus photo violation monitoring systems except: (A) as required to estab- 42 lish liability under this section or collect payment of penalties; (B) 43 as required by court order; or (C) as otherwise required permitted by 44 law; 45 (iii) the installation of signage in conformance with standards estab- 46 lished in the MUTCD at each roadway entrance of the jurisdictional boun- 47 daries of such county, city, town or village giving notice that school 48 bus photo violation monitoring systems are used to enforce restrictions 49 on vehicles violating subdivision (a) of section eleven hundred seven- 50 ty-four of this article. For the purposes of this paragraph, the term 51 "roadway" shall not include state expressway routes or state interstate 52 routes but shall include controlled-access highway exit ramps that enter 53 the jurisdictional boundaries of a county, city, town or village; and 54 (iv) oversight procedures to ensure compliance with the aforementioned 55 privacy protection measures. S. 7955--B 7 1 § 7. Subdivision (c) of section 1174-a of the vehicle and traffic law, 2 as added by chapter 145 of the laws of 2019, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 (c) For purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the 5 following meanings: "county" shall have the meaning provided in section 6 three of the county law, except that such term shall not include any 7 county wholly contained within a city; "local tribunal" shall mean a 8 traffic violations bureau established pursuant to section three hundred 9 seventy of the general municipal law where the violation occurred or, if 10 there be none, by the court having jurisdiction over traffic infractions 11 where the violation occurred, except that if a county, city, town, or 12 village has established an administrative tribunal to hear and determine 13 complaints of traffic infractions constituting parking, standing or 14 stopping violations such county, city, town, or village may, by local 15 law, authorize such adjudication by such tribunal and except that adju- 16 dication of liability imposed upon owners by this section for violations 17 occurring in the city of New York shall be by the New York city parking 18 violations bureau; "manual on uniform traffic control devices" or 19 "MUTCD" shall mean the manual and specifications for a uniform system of 20 traffic control devices maintained by the commissioner of transportation 21 pursuant to section sixteen hundred eighty of this chapter; "owner" 22 shall have the meaning provided in article two-B of this chapter; 23 "school district" shall have the meaning as "educational agency" as 24 provided in section two-d of the education law; and "school bus photo 25 violation monitoring system" shall mean a device that is capable of 26 operating independently of an enforcement officer which is installed to 27 work in conjunction with a school bus stop-arm and which automatically 28 produces two or more photographs, two or more microphotographs, a vide- 29 otape or other recorded images of a vehicle at the time it is used or 30 operated in violation of subdivision (a) of section eleven hundred 31 seventy-four of this article. 32 § 8. Paragraph 2 of subdivision (g) of section 1174-a of the vehicle 33 and traffic law, as amended by section 4 of part AA of chapter 56 of the 34 laws of 2024, is amended and a new paragraph 4 is added to read as 35 follows: 36 2. A notice of liability shall contain the name and address of the 37 person alleged to be liable as an owner for a violation of subdivision 38 (a) of section eleven hundred seventy-four of this article pursuant to 39 this section[,]; the registration number of the vehicle involved in such 40 violation[,]; the location where such violation took place, the date and 41 time of such violation[,]; the identification number of the school bus 42 photo violation monitoring system which recorded the violation or other 43 document locator number[,]; and the registration number of the school 44 bus on which the school bus photo violation monitoring system which 45 recorded the violation was installed; instructions for payment, noting 46 that payment is deemed an admission of liability; information advising 47 the person charged of the manner and the time in which they may contest 48 the liability alleged in the notice within thirty-seven days of receipt, 49 which may include an in-person hearing in accordance with the provisions 50 of subdivision (h) of this section, and at the discretion of the local 51 tribunal, may also include contestation by online video conferencing or 52 by mail through submission of a written explanation. 53 4. For the purposes of this section, the notice of liability contain- 54 ing the information set forth in paragraph two of this subdivision shall 55 be deemed sufficient to initiate proceedings in accordance with the S. 7955--B 8 1 procedures set forth in this subdivision and subdivision (h) of this 2 section. 3 § 9. Subdivision (h) of section 1174-a of the vehicle and traffic law, 4 as added by chapter 145 of the laws of 2019, is amended to read as 5 follows: 6 (h) Adjudication of the liability imposed upon owners by this section 7 shall be by [a traffic violations bureau established pursuant to section 8 three hundred seventy of the general municipal law where the violation 9 occurred or, if there be none, by the court having jurisdiction over 10 traffic infractions where the violation occurred, except that if a city 11 has established an administrative tribunal to hear and determine 12 complaints of traffic infractions constituting parking, standing or 13 stopping violations such city may, by local law, authorize such adjudi- 14 cation by such tribunal] a local tribunal pursuant to this section. For 15 any local tribunal pursuant to this section having jurisdiction over 16 traffic infractions where the violation occurred, a notice of liability 17 validly imposed in accordance with subdivision (g) of this section shall 18 be valid for purposes of such tribunal adjudicating such liability, and 19 such tribunal shall adjudicate such liability in a manner not inconsist- 20 ent with the procedures for a hearing officer pursuant to paragraphs 21 (a), (b) and (c) of subdivision two of sections two hundred forty and 22 two hundred forty-one of this chapter. Provided, however, subsequent 23 judicial review may be sought pursuant to article seventy-eight of the 24 civil practice law and rules. Notwithstanding any other provision of 25 law, such local tribunal may adjudicate such liability remotely by 26 online video conferencing or by mail through submission of a written 27 explanation. Within fourteen business days after the local tribunal has 28 rendered a decision, a notice of decision shall be prepared and sent by 29 first class mail to the owner by the local tribunal or its designee. A 30 manual or automatic record of mailing prepared in the ordinary course of 31 business shall be prima facie evidence of the facts contained therein. 32 If the owner is deemed liable, they shall be notified that nonpayment of 33 the penalty imposed in the manner and time provided shall be deemed an 34 admission of liability and that a default judgment may be entered there- 35 on. 36 § 10. Paragraphs 1, 2 and 2-b of subdivision (a) of section 1180-e of 37 the vehicle and traffic law, paragraphs 1 and 2 as amended by section 1 38 and paragraph 2-b as added by section 2 of part Q of chapter 58 of the 39 laws of 2025, are amended to read as follows: 40 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commissioner of 41 transportation is hereby authorized to establish a demonstration program 42 imposing monetary liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure of an 43 operator thereof to comply with posted maximum speed limits in a highway 44 construction or maintenance work area located on a controlled-access 45 highway: (i) when highway construction or maintenance work is occurring 46 and a work area speed limit is in effect as provided in paragraph two of 47 subdivision (d) or subdivision (f) of section eleven hundred eighty of 48 this article; or (ii) when highway construction or maintenance work is 49 occurring and other speed limits are in effect as provided in subdivi- 50 sion (b) or (g) or paragraph one of subdivision (d) of section eleven 51 hundred eighty of this article. Such demonstration program shall empower 52 the commissioner to install photo speed violation monitoring systems 53 within no more than forty highway construction or maintenance work areas 54 located on controlled-access highways and to operate such systems within 55 such work areas; (iii) when highway construction or maintenance work is 56 occurring and a work area speed limit is in effect as provided in para- S. 7955--B 9 1 graph two of subdivision (d) or subdivision (f) of section eleven 2 hundred eighty of this article; or (iv) when highway construction or 3 maintenance work is occurring and other speed limits are in effect as 4 provided in subdivision (b) or (g) or paragraph one of subdivision (d) 5 of section eleven hundred eighty of this article. The commissioner, in 6 consultation with the superintendent of the division of state police, 7 shall determine the location of the highway construction or maintenance 8 work areas located on a controlled-access highway in which to install 9 and operate photo speed violation monitoring systems. In selecting a 10 highway construction or maintenance work area in which to install and 11 operate a photo speed violation monitoring system, the commissioner 12 shall consider criteria including, but not limited to, the speed data, 13 crash history, and roadway geometry applicable to such highway 14 construction or maintenance work area. A photo speed violation monitor- 15 ing system shall not be installed or operated on a controlled-access 16 highway exit ramp. The commissioner and a local tribunal may enter into 17 a memorandum of understanding for the purposes of facilitating adjudi- 18 cation of liability imposed upon owners by this section. Such memorandum 19 may address provisions for cost sharing and prosecutorial responsibil- 20 ities. 21 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, after holding a public 22 hearing in accordance with the public officers law and subsequent 23 approval of the establishment of a demonstration program in accordance 24 with this section by a majority of the members of the entire board of 25 the thruway authority, the chair of the thruway authority is hereby 26 authorized to establish a demonstration program imposing monetary 27 liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure of an operator thereof 28 to comply with posted maximum speed limits in a highway construction or 29 maintenance work area located on the thruway: (i) when highway 30 construction or maintenance work is occurring and a work area speed 31 limit is in effect as provided in paragraph two of subdivision (d) or 32 subdivision (f) of section eleven hundred eighty of this article; or 33 (ii) when highway construction or maintenance work is occurring and 34 other speed limits are in effect as provided in subdivision (b) or (g) 35 or paragraph one of subdivision (d) of section eleven hundred eighty of 36 this article. Such demonstration program shall empower such chair to 37 install photo speed violation monitoring systems within no more than 38 twenty highway construction or maintenance work areas located on the 39 thruway and to operate such systems within such work areas; (iii) when 40 highway construction or maintenance work is occurring and a work area 41 speed limit is in effect as provided in paragraph two of subdivision (d) 42 or subdivision (f) of section eleven hundred eighty of this article; or 43 (iv) when highway construction or maintenance work is occurring and 44 other speed limits are in effect as provided in subdivision (b) or (g) 45 or paragraph one of subdivision (d) of section eleven hundred eighty of 46 this article. The chair of the thruway authority, in consultation with 47 the superintendent of the division of state police, shall determine the 48 location of the highway construction or maintenance work areas located 49 on the thruway in which to install and operate photo speed violation 50 monitoring systems. In selecting a highway construction or maintenance 51 work area in which to install and operate a photo speed violation moni- 52 toring system, such chair shall consider criteria including, but not 53 limited to, the speed data, crash history, and roadway geometry applica- 54 ble to such highway construction or maintenance work area. A photo speed 55 violation monitoring system shall not be installed or operated on a 56 thruway exit ramp. The chair of the thruway authority and a local S. 7955--B 10 1 tribunal may enter into a memorandum of understanding for the purposes 2 of facilitating adjudication of liability imposed upon owners by this 3 section. Such memorandum may address provisions for cost sharing and 4 prosecutorial responsibilities. 5 2-b. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, after holding a 6 public hearing in accordance with the public officers law and subsequent 7 approval of the establishment of a demonstration program in accordance 8 with this section by a majority of the members of the entire board of 9 the bridge authority, the chair of the bridge authority is hereby 10 authorized to establish a demonstration program imposing monetary 11 liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure of an operator thereof 12 to comply with posted maximum speed limits in a highway construction or 13 maintenance work area located on bridge authority facilities: (i) when 14 highway construction or maintenance work is occurring and a work area 15 speed limit is in effect as provided in paragraph two of subdivision (d) 16 or subdivision (f) of section eleven hundred eighty of this article; or 17 (ii) when highway construction or maintenance work is occurring and 18 other speed limits are in effect as provided in subdivision (b) or (g) 19 or paragraph one of subdivision (d) of section eleven hundred eighty of 20 this article. Such demonstration program shall empower such chair to 21 install photo speed violation monitoring systems within no more than 22 five highway construction or maintenance work areas located on bridge 23 authority facilities and to operate such systems within such work areas; 24 (iii) when highway construction or maintenance work is occurring and a 25 work area speed limit is in effect as provided in paragraph two of 26 subdivision (d) or subdivision (f) of section eleven hundred eighty of 27 this article; or (iv) when highway construction or maintenance work is 28 occurring and other speed limits are in effect as provided in subdivi- 29 sion (b) or (g) or paragraph one of subdivision (d) of section eleven 30 hundred eighty of this article. The chair of the bridge authority, in 31 consultation with the superintendent of the division of state police, 32 shall determine the location of the highway construction or maintenance 33 work areas located on bridge authority facilities in which to install 34 and operate photo speed violation monitoring systems. In selecting a 35 highway construction or maintenance work area in which to install and 36 operate a photo speed violation monitoring system, such chair shall 37 consider criteria including, but not limited to, the speed data, crash 38 history, and roadway geometry applicable to such highway construction or 39 maintenance work area. The New York state department of transportation 40 may enter into a memorandum of understanding with the bridge authority 41 for the purposes of coordinating the planning, design, and installation 42 of photo speed violation monitoring systems in such photo speed 43 violation monitoring demonstration program. Such memorandum shall 44 address, for purposes of such demonstration program, the use of systems, 45 devices and other facilities owned and operated by the state. The chair 46 of the bridge authority and a local tribunal may enter into a memorandum 47 of understanding for the purposes of facilitating adjudication of 48 liability imposed upon owners by this section. Such memorandum may 49 address provisions for cost sharing and prosecutorial responsibilities. 50 § 11. Paragraphs 12 and 13 of subdivision (c) of section 1180-e of the 51 vehicle and traffic law, as added by section 2 of part Q of chapter 58 52 of the laws of 2025, are amended and a new paragraph 14 is added to read 53 as follows: 54 12. "Triborough bridge and tunnel authority" shall mean the corpo- 55 ration organized pursuant to section five hundred fifty-two of the 56 public authorities law; [and] S. 7955--B 11 1 13. "Triborough bridge and tunnel authority facility" shall mean the 2 following bridges and tunnels under the jurisdiction of the Triborough 3 bridge and tunnel authority: the Bronx-Whitestone bridge; the Cross Bay 4 Veterans Memorial bridge; the Henry Hudson bridge; the Marine Parkway- 5 Gil Hodges Memorial bridge; the Robert F. Kennedy bridge; the Throgs 6 Neck bridge; the Verrazzano-Narrows bridge; the Hugh L. Carey tunnel; 7 and the Queens Midtown tunnel[.]; and 8 14. "Local tribunal" shall mean a traffic violations bureau estab- 9 lished pursuant to section three hundred seventy of the general munici- 10 pal law where the violation occurred or, if there be none, by the court 11 having jurisdiction over traffic infractions where the violation 12 occurred, except that if a county, city, town, or village has estab- 13 lished an administrative tribunal to hear and determine complaints of 14 traffic infractions constituting parking, standing or stopping 15 violations such county, city, town, or village may, by local law, 16 authorize such adjudication by such tribunal and except that adjudi- 17 cation of liability imposed upon owners by this section for violations 18 occurring in the city of New York shall be by the New York city parking 19 violations bureau. 20 § 12. Subdivision (g) of section 1180-e of the vehicle and traffic law 21 is amended by adding a new paragraph 5 to read as follows: 22 5. For the purposes of this section, the notice of liability contain- 23 ing the information set forth in paragraph two of this subdivision shall 24 be deemed sufficient to initiate proceedings in accordance with the 25 procedures set forth in this subdivision and subdivision (h) of this 26 section. 27 § 13. Subdivision (h) of section 1180-e of the vehicle and traffic 28 law, as amended by section 2 of part Q of chapter 58 of the laws of 29 2025, is amended to read as follows: 30 (h) Adjudication of the liability imposed upon owners by this section 31 shall be by a [traffic violations bureau established pursuant to section 32 three hundred seventy of the general municipal law where the violation 33 occurred or, if there be none, by the court having jurisdiction over 34 traffic infractions where the violation occurred, except that if a city 35 has established an administrative tribunal to hear and determine 36 complaints of traffic infractions constituting parking, standing or 37 stopping violations such city may, by local law, authorize such adjudi- 38 cation by such tribunal and except that adjudication of liability 39 imposed upon owners by this section for violations occurring in the city 40 of New York shall be by the New York city parking violations bureau.] 41 local tribunal pursuant to this section. For any local tribunal pursuant 42 to this section having jurisdiction over traffic infractions where the 43 violation occurred, a notice of liability validly imposed in accordance 44 with subdivision (g) of this section shall be valid for purposes of such 45 tribunal adjudicating such liability, and such tribunal shall adjudicate 46 such liability in a manner not inconsistent with the procedures for a 47 hearing officer pursuant to paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of subdivision 48 two of sections two hundred forty and two hundred forty-one of this 49 chapter. Provided, however, subsequent judicial review may be sought 50 pursuant to article seventy-eight of the civil practice law and rules. 51 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, such local tribunal may 52 adjudicate such liability remotely by online video conferencing or by 53 mail through submission of a written explanation. Within fourteen busi- 54 ness days after the local tribunal has rendered a decision, a notice of 55 decision shall be prepared and sent by first class mail to the owner by 56 the local tribunal or its designee. A manual or automatic record of S. 7955--B 12 1 mailing prepared in the ordinary course of business shall be prima facie 2 evidence of the facts contained therein. If the owner is deemed liable, 3 they shall be notified that nonpayment of the penalty imposed in the 4 manner and time provided shall be deemed an admission of liability and 5 that a default judgment may be entered thereon. 6 § 14. The opening paragraph of subparagraph (i) of paragraph 2 of 7 subdivision (j) of section 1180-e of the vehicle and traffic law, as 8 amended by section 2 of part Q of chapter 58 of the laws of 2025, is 9 amended to read as follows: 10 In the city of New York and in any county, city, town, or village 11 which, by local law, has authorized the adjudication of liability 12 imposed upon owners by this section by a parking violations bureau, an 13 owner who is a lessor of a vehicle to which a notice of liability was 14 issued pursuant to subdivision (g) of this section shall not be liable 15 for the violation of subdivision (b), (d), (f) or (g) of section eleven 16 hundred eighty of this article, provided that: 17 § 15. Subdivision 10 of section 1803 of the vehicle and traffic law, 18 as added by chapter 145 of the laws of 2019, is amended to read as 19 follows: 20 10. Except where a county by local law has authorized an administra- 21 tive tribunal to hear impositions of monetary liability on the owner of 22 a vehicle for failure of an operator thereof to comply with section 23 eleven hundred seventy-four of this chapter in accordance with section 24 eleven hundred seventy-four-a of this chapter or as otherwise provided 25 in paragraph e of subdivision one of this section, where a county has 26 established a demonstration program imposing monetary liability on the 27 owner of a vehicle for failure of an operator thereof to comply with 28 section eleven hundred seventy-four of this chapter in accordance with 29 section eleven hundred seventy-four-a of this chapter, any fine or 30 penalty collected by a court, judge, magistrate or other officer for an 31 imposition of liability which occurs within such county pursuant to such 32 program shall be paid to the state comptroller within the first ten days 33 of the month following collection. Every such payment shall be accompa- 34 nied by a statement in such form and detail as the comptroller shall 35 provide. The comptroller shall pay ninety percent of any such fine or 36 penalty imposed for such liability to the county in which the violation 37 giving rise to the liability occurred, and ten percent of any such fine 38 or penalty to the city, town or village in which the violation giving 39 rise to the liability occurred. 40 § 16. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 41 the amendments to: 42 1. paragraphs 1 and 2 of subdivision (a) of section 1174-a of the 43 vehicle and traffic law made by section four of this act shall not 44 affect the repeal of such section and shall be deemed repealed there- 45 with; 46 2. subparagraph (i) of paragraph 3 of subdivision (a) of section 47 1174-a of the vehicle and traffic law made by section five of this act 48 shall not affect the repeal of such section and shall be deemed repealed 49 therewith; 50 3. paragraph 4 of subdivision (a) of section 1174-a of the vehicle and 51 traffic law made by section six of this act shall not affect the repeal 52 of such section and shall be deemed repealed therewith; 53 4. subdivision (c) of section 1174-a of the vehicle and traffic law 54 made by section seven of this act shall not affect the repeal of such 55 section and shall be deemed repealed therewith; S. 7955--B 13 1 5. paragraph 2 of subdivision (g) of section 1174-a of the vehicle and 2 traffic law made by section eight of this act shall not affect the 3 repeal of such section and shall be deemed repealed therewith; 4 6. subdivision (h) of section 1174-a of the vehicle and traffic law 5 made by section nine of this act shall not affect the repeal of such 6 section and shall be deemed repealed therewith; 7 7. paragraphs 1, 2 and 2-b of subdivision (a) of section 1180-e of the 8 vehicle and traffic law made by section ten of this act shall not affect 9 the repeal of such section and shall be deemed repealed therewith; 10 8. paragraphs 12, 13 and 14 of subdivision (c) of section 1180-e of 11 the vehicle and traffic law made by section eleven of this act shall not 12 affect the repeal of such section and shall be deemed repealed there- 13 with; 14 9. paragraph 5 of subdivision (g) of section 1180-e of the vehicle and 15 traffic law made by section twelve of this act shall not affect the 16 repeal of such section and shall be deemed repealed therewith; 17 10. subdivision (h) of section 1180-e of the vehicle and traffic law 18 made by section thirteen of this act shall not affect the repeal of such 19 section and shall be deemed repealed therewith; 20 11. subparagraph (i) of paragraph 2 of subdivision (j) of section 21 1180-e of the vehicle and traffic law made by section fourteen of this 22 act shall not affect the repeal of such section and shall be deemed 23 repealed therewith; and 24 12. subdivision 10 of section 1803 of the vehicle and traffic law made 25 by section fifteen of this act shall not affect the repeal of such 26 subdivision and shall be deemed repealed therewith.